Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.22.1 of Title 59, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “over-the-counter medication” means


medication that may be legally sold and purchased without a


prescription.


B. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, ivermectin suitable


for human use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter


medication in this state without a prescription or consultation with


a health care professional.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-1-1983 DC 4/4/2025 4:03:03 PM

Req. No. 1983 Page 1